dictsource/ia_rules
// Interlingua translation rules for Espeak
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// GI: Unstressed i and u turn into semiconsonants before a following vowel; 
// 	e.g. Bulgaria, filatorio, persuader

.group a
	a	a
	ai	aI
	au	aU

.group e
	e	e
	ei	eI
	eu	eU

.group i
	i	i 
	i (A	j // turns into j if followed by vowel

     &) i (c_   =i  // stress on previous syllable
     &) i (ca_  =i
     &) i (co_  =i
     &) i (da_  =i
     &) i (do_  =i
        i (fic_ 'i
        i (fico_ 'i
     

.group o
	o	o
	oi	oI

.group u
	u	u 
	u (A	w // turns into w if followed by vowel.

     &) u (la_  =u  // stress on previous syllable
     &) u (lo_  =u
  
	
// GI: DOUBLE CONSONANTS merge in pronunciation. 


.group b
	b	b
	b (b

	
// GI: c before e, i, y is pronounced like ts in 'hats' (or, optionally, like
// c in 'city'); otherwise like c in 'cats'; ch like ch in 'echo', 'chrome';
.group c
	c 	k
	c (c
	c (e	ts
	c (i	ts
	c (y	ts
// GI: The digraph ch stands frequently for the sound of sh in 'English' 
//	and is respelled as sh; e.g. choc (sh-).
	ch	tS // reduce deviation spellings by making ch standardized
	ch (l	k
	ch (r	k


.group d
	d 	d
	d (d

	
.group f
	f 	f
	f (f


.group g 
	g 	g
	g (g

	
// GI: h as in English (or, optionally, silent); after r and t, silent;
.group h
	h 	h
	h (h
     r) h
     t) h

     
// GI: like z in 'azure' (or, optionally, like g in 'gem' or like y in 'yes');
.group j
	j 	Z // like z in azure
	j (j


.group k
	k 	k
	k (k


.group l
	l 	l
	l (l


.group m
	m 	m
	m (m


//	The sounds of g and k assimilate a preceding n as in English. 
.group n
	n 	n
	n (n
	n (k	N
	n (g	N
	n (q	N

.group p
	p 	p
	p (p
	ph	f

	
.group q
	q	k
	q (q


// GI: r like rr in 'merry' or, better, like r in Spanish 'caro';
.group r
	r	R // description too vague, so using standard r trill.
	r (r

	
// GI: like s in 'stay'; between vowels, the same 
// 	(or, optionally, like s in 'these'); 
//	e.g. sparse, abstruse, accusativo;
// GI: sound of sh in 'English'
.group s
	s	s // s always s for simplicity.
	s (s
	sh	S
	s (_S1  s

// GI:     as in English; ti before vowels, unless stressed or preceded by s,
//	 like tsy in 'he gets you' (or, optionally, like sy in 'we pass you'
//	 or like ty in 'we let you'); e.g. actor, garantia, question, 
//	but action, reverentia;


// GI: h as in English (or, optionally, silent); after r and t, silent;
.group t
	t	t
	t (t
	th	t // after t, h is silent.
	//ti	S // too variable, English S, French s, latin t, keeping t.

.group v
	v	v
	v (v

	
.group w
	w	w
	w (w

	
// GI: x like x in 'fox'; between vowels, the same 
//	(or, optionally, like x in 'exact');
.group x
	x	ks // always ks for simplicty.
	x (x

	
// GI: y unstressed before vowels, like y in 'yes'; 
//	otherwise like i in 'machine'; e.g. Yugoslavia, typo. 
.group y
	y (A	j // j before vowels
     A) y	j // ??
	y	i // i otherwise
	
	
.group z
	z	z
	z (z
	
